Massachusetts, session 194th, H1269.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 official edition, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end of Section 22C the following:
When policy holders change auto insurance companies or cancel pre paid policies they
shall be entitled to a pro rate rebate for the exact number of days paid for in the policy without
any surcharge or expenses beyond the exact days the policy was in effect.
of 1